Utah statutes.
41-6a-215.   Right of real property owner to regulate traffic.

Except as provided under Section 41-6a-214, this chapter does not prevent the owner of real property used by the public for purposes of vehicular travel by permission of the owner and not as matter of right from:

(1)  prohibiting the use;

(2)  requiring other conditions not specified in this chapter; or

(3)  otherwise regulating the use as preferred by the owner.

